Illinois, session 104th, HB3797.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 521B-80 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/21B-80)7    Sec. 21B-80. Conviction of certain offenses as grounds for 8disqualification for licensure or suspension or revocation of 9a license.10    (a) As used in this Section:11    "Drug offense" means any one or more of the following 12offenses:13        (1) Any offense defined in the Cannabis Control Act, 14    except those defined in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of 15    Section 4 and subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 5 of the 16    Cannabis Control Act and any offense for which the holder 17    of a license is placed on probation under the provisions 18    of Section 10 of the Cannabis Control Act, provided that 19    if the terms and conditions of probation required by the 20    court are not fulfilled, the offense is not eligible for 21    this exception.22        (2) Any offense defined in the Illinois Controlled 23    Substances Act, except any offense for which the holder of   HB3797- 2 -LRB104 10530 LNS 20605 b1    a license is placed on probation under the provisions of 2    Section 410 of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, 3    provided that if the terms and conditions of probation 4    required by the court are not fulfilled, the offense is 5    not eligible for this exception.6        (3) Any offense defined in the Methamphetamine Control 7    and Community Protection Act, except any offense for which 8    the holder of a license is placed on probation under the 9    provision of Section 70 of that Act, provided that if the 10    terms and conditions of probation required by the court 11    are not fulfilled, the offense is not eligible for this 12    exception.13        (4) Any attempt to commit any of the offenses listed 14    in items (1) through (3) of this definition.15        (5) Any offense committed or attempted in any other 16    state or against the laws of the United States that, if 17    committed or attempted in this State, would have been 18    punishable as one or more of the offenses listed in items 19    (1) through (4) of this definition.20The changes made by Public Act 96-431 to this definition are 21declaratory of existing law.22    "Sentence" includes any period of supervised release or 23probation that was imposed either alone or in combination with 24a period of incarceration.25    "Sex or other offense" means any one or more of the 26following offenses:  HB3797- 3 -LRB104 10530 LNS 20605 b1        (A) Any offense defined in Article 9 of the Criminal 2    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012; Sections 11-6, 3    11-9 through 11-9.5, inclusive, and 11-30 (if punished as 4    a Class 4 felony) of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 5    Criminal Code of 2012; Sections 11-14.1 through 11-21, 6    inclusive, of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 7    Code of 2012; Sections 11-23 (if punished as a Class 3 8    felony), 11-24, 11-25, and 11-26 of the Criminal Code of 9    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012; Section 10-5.1, 10    subsection (c) of Section 10-9, and Sections 11-6.6, 11    11-11, 12-3.05, 12-3.3, 12-6.4, 12-7.1, 12-34, 12-34.5, 12    and 12-35 of the Criminal Code of 2012; and Sections 13    11-1.20, 11-1.30, 11-1.40, 11-1.50, 11-1.60, 12-13, 12-14, 14    12-14.1, 12-15, 12-16, 12-32, 12-33, 12C-45, and 26-4 (if 15    punished pursuant to subdivision (4) or (5) of subsection 16    (d) of Section 26-4) of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 17    Criminal Code of 2012.18        (B) Any attempt to commit any of the offenses listed 19    in item (A) of this definition.20        (C) Any offense committed or attempted in any other 21    state that, if committed or attempted in this State, would 22    have been punishable as one or more of the offenses listed 23    in items (A) and (B) of this definition.24    (b) Whenever the holder of any license issued pursuant to 25this Article or applicant for a license to be issued pursuant 26to this Article has been convicted of any drug offense, other   HB3797- 4 -LRB104 10530 LNS 20605 b1than as provided in subsection (c) of this Section, the State 2Superintendent of Education shall forthwith suspend the 3license or deny the application, whichever is applicable, 4until 7 years following the end of the sentence for the 5criminal offense. If the conviction is reversed and the holder 6is acquitted of the offense in a new trial or the charges 7against him or her are dismissed, the State Superintendent of 8Education shall forthwith terminate the suspension of the 9license.10    (b-5) Whenever the holder of a license issued pursuant to 11this Article or applicant for a license to be issued pursuant 12to this Article has been charged with attempting to commit, 13conspiring to commit, soliciting, or committing any sex or 14other offense, as enumerated under item (A) of subsection (a), 15first degree murder, or a Class X felony or any offense 16committed or attempted in any other state or against the laws 17of the United States that, if committed or attempted in this 18State, would have been punishable as one or more of the 19foregoing offenses, the State Superintendent of Education 20shall immediately suspend the license or deny the application 21until the person's criminal charges are adjudicated through a 22court of competent jurisdiction. If the person is acquitted, 23his or her license or application shall be immediately 24reinstated. 25    (c) Whenever the holder of a license issued pursuant to 26this Article or applicant for a license to be issued pursuant   HB3797- 5 -LRB104 10530 LNS 20605 b1to this Article has been convicted of attempting to commit, 2conspiring to commit, soliciting, or committing any sex or 3other offense, as enumerated under item (A) of subsection (a), 4first degree murder, or a Class X felony or any offense 5committed or attempted in any other state or against the laws 6of the United States that, if committed or attempted in this 7State, would have been punishable as one or more of the 8foregoing offenses, the State Superintendent of Education 9shall forthwith suspend the license or deny the application, 10whichever is applicable. If the conviction is reversed and the 11holder is acquitted of that offense in a new trial or the 12charges that he or she committed that offense are dismissed, 13the State Superintendent of Education shall forthwith 14terminate the suspension of the license. When the conviction 15becomes final, the State Superintendent of Education shall 16forthwith revoke the license.17    (d) The State Board of Education shall create a system for 18the automatic suspension of a license issued pursuant to this 19Article if the holder of that license has been convicted of a 20crime under Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012 or a crime 21that requires registration under the Sex Offender Registration 22Act. 23(Source: P.A. 101-531, eff. 8-23-19; 102-552, eff. 1-1-22.)